Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-558
Intergovernmental data services system, defined.

Intergovernmental data services system means the installation and use of applications on a computer network that allows for the intergovernmental transfer of data, automation of multijurisdictional functions, and integration of governmental entities that involve multiple locations separated by long distances. Intergovernmental data services system includes computers that serve as platforms for statewide applications, cabling, other equipment essential to operating the computers, and operating programs that allow the computers to function. Intergovernmental data services system does not include any applications.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 328.